src/fst/affixes/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverbs
! --------------------
!! The Lushootseed language adverbs

LEXICON ADV_
:        K   ;

LEXICON ADV-DEGREE_
+Deg:        K   ;

LEXICON ADV-INTERR_
+Interr:        K   ;

LEXICON ADV-PARENTHETIC_
+Parenthetic:        K   ;

LEXICON ADV-QNT_
+Qnt: K ;

LEXICON ADV-TOT_
+Tot: K ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT_
+Spat:        K   ;

LEXICON ADV-TEMP_
+Temp:        K   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
