src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverbs
!  ----------
!! Adverbs in the LUSHOOTSEED language 

LEXICON Adverbs
čad+Adv:čad    ADV_INTERR  "where" ;
tul̕čad+Adv:tul̕%^√čád    ADV_INTERR  "where, whence" ; ! some type of spellrelax á+Adv:a probably dict
ʔəsčal+Adv:ʔəsčal  ADV_INTERR  "how" ;

cay+Adv:cay ADV_DEGREE "very" ;
cick̓ʷ+Adv:cick̓ʷ ADV_DEGREE "very" ;
cukʷ+v1+Adv:cukʷ ADV_DEGREE "only, uniquely" ;
cukʷ+v2+Adv:cugʷ ADV_DEGREE "only, uniquely" ;
day̓+Adv:day̓ ADV_DEGREE "only, uniquely, separate; foremost, especially; completely, all" ;
hiqab+Adv:hiqab ADV_DEGREE "excessively, too (much)" ; 

q̓ixʷ+Adv:q̓íxʷ ADV_ "upstream" ;


hikʷ+Adv:hikʷ ADV_DEGREE "big, very, really" ;
laʔab+v1+Adv:laʔab ADV_ "really, a lot" ;
laʔab+v2+Adv:həlaʔab ADV_ "really, a lot" ;
ƛ̕al̕+Adv:ƛ̕al̕ ADV_ "also, too" ;
put+Adv:put ADV_ "very much so, in a great way" ;
x̌ʷəɬ% ti+Adv:x̌ʷəɬ% ti ADV_ "as though, like" ;
x̌ʷul̕+Adv:x̌ʷul̕ ADV_ "just (that and nothing else)" ;

tul̕ʔal+Adv:tul̕ʔal ADV_SPAT "from" ;! is this a preposition?
siʔ+Adv:siʔ ADV_SPAT "here" ;
diʔəʔ+Adv:diʔəʔ ADV_SPAT "here" ;
tudiʔ+Adv:tudiʔ ADV_SPAT "yonder" ;
tiləb+v1+Adv:tiləb ADV_SPAT "right there, suddenly" ;
tiləb+v2+Adv:tiiləb ADV_SPAT "right there, suddenly" ;
dxʷt̕aq̓t+Adv:dxʷt̕aq̓t ADV_SPAT "on shore" ;

ʔaɬ+Adv:ʔáɬ ADV_ "fast; quickly" ;
ʔaɬaɬ+Adv:ʔáɬaɬ ADV_ "hurry up! (OC_12323)" ;


t̕aq̓t+Adv:t̕aq̓t ADV_SPAT "on shore" ;

bək̓ʷ+Adv:bək̓ʷ ADV_TOT "all" ;
qa+Adv:qa ADV_QNT "many" ;

ck̓ʷaqid+Adv:ck̓ʷaqid ADV_TEMP "always" ;
cəɬul̕+Adv:cəɬul̕ ADV_TEMP "previously, in advance" ;
daʔxʷ+Adv:daʔxʷ ADV_TEMP "just now" ;
daw̓+Adv:daw̓ ADV_TEMP "just now" ;
gʷaʔxʷ+Adv:gʷaʔxʷ ADV_TEMP "eventually, soon" ;
huy+Adv:huy ADV_TEMP "then" ;
tiləb+Adv:tiləb ADV_TEMP "immediately, bluntly" ;
yaw̓+Adv:yaw̓ ADV_TEMP "only if, not until" ;
hagʷ+Adv:hagʷ ADV_TEMP "long time ago" ;
haʔkʷ+Adv:haʔkʷ ADV_TEMP "long time ago" ;
ɬixʷdat+Adv:ɬixʷdat ADV_TEMP "for three days" ;

gʷəhaw̓ə+Adv:gʷəhaw̓ə ADV_PARENTHETIC "it seems" ;
xʷɬub+Adv:xʷɬub ADV_PARENTHETIC "ultimately, in fact" ;
xʷuʔələʔ+Adv:xʷuʔələʔ ADV_PARENTHETIC "maybe, perhaps" ;
tux̌ʷ+Adv:tux̌ʷ ADV_PARENTHETIC "in contrast to the usual or expected" ;

ƛ̕ub+Aux:ƛ̕ub # "well; ought, should" ;
xʷiʔ+v1+Aux+Neg:xʷiʔ # "no; not" ;
xʷiʔ+v2+Aux+Neg:xʷiiʔ # "no; not" ;
gʷəl+Aux+Top:gʷəl # "topic?" ;

ʔu+Pcle+Qst:ʔu PCLE_ "question";
əw̓ə+Pcle:əw̓ə PCLE_ ;
dᶻəɬ+Pcle:dᶻəɬ PCLE_ ;
uʔxʷ+Pcle:uʔxʷ PCLE_ ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
